Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-192
Commodities; sale; weight, measure, count.

Except as otherwise provided by the director, commodities in liquid form shall be sold by liquid measure or by weight and commodities not in liquid form shall be sold only by weight, by measure, or by count, so long as the method of sale provides the ability for cost comparison and accurate quantity information.

Laws 1972, LB 1413, § 10;

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 21.